Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.200

Answer.

On the return of the alternative, or the day on which the application for the writ is noticed, the party on whom the writ or notice has been served may show cause by answer, under oath, made in the same manner as an answer to a complaint in a civil action.

[ 1895 c 65 s 20; RRS s 1018.]